Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.455

Compliance with section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964, and Title IX of the educational amendments of 1972.

Each community and technical college shall comply with relevant federal requirements for implementing section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, and as thereafter amended, Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964, and as thereafter amended, and Title IX of education amendments of 1972, and as thereafter amended.

[ 2015 c 55 s 227; 1991 c 238 s 158.]